Utah statutes.
53A-15-405.   Salaries -- Costs.

(1)  Salaries and other necessary expenses of the state adult education staff shall be paid from funds appropriated for adult education.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall determine the terms and conditions of payment.

(3)  A local school board shall pay all costs incident to the local administration and operation of its adult education program.

(4)  The board shall submit reports required by the State Board of Education for the administration of adult education.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

